Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,138
Grievance procedures; inmates to be informed of procedures.

All inmates shall be informed of the grievance procedures established by the department and copies of such procedures shall be available to all inmates.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 83-4,118;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 63.